Georgia, session 2025_26, HB419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 419 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 61 0188S
PART I.
SECTION 1-1.
Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education, is amended in Part
2 of Article 2 of Chapter 3, relating to university system, by adding a new Code section to
read as follows:
"20-3-88.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Automated external defibrillator' means a defibrillator which:
(A) Is capable of cardiac rhythm analysis;
(B) Will charge and be capable of being activated to deliver a countershock after
electrically detecting the presence of certain cardiac dysrhythmias; and
(C) Is capable of continuous recording of the cardiac dysrhythmia at the scene with a
mechanism for transfer and storage or for printing for review subsequent to use.
(2) 'Community funding source' means local sources of capital provided by local banking
institutions, including credit unions, community foundations, county or municipal
governments, businesses, or residents. Such funding sources may include grants, gifts,
contracts, monetary donations, or loans.
(3) 'Institution' means any college, school, academy, university, or experiment station at
any particular location which forms a part of the university system.
(4) 'Opioid antagonist' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section
26-4-116.2.
(5) 'Opioid antagonist storage compartment' means the structure in which opioid
antagonists may be stored.
(6) 'University system' means the University System of Georgia.
H. B. 419 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 61 0188S
(b) No student, visitor, or university system employee shall be prohibited from possessing
an opioid antagonist on university system property or at a university system sponsored
activity.
(c) Subject to available funding from community funding sources, each institution shall
acquire and maintain a supply of opioid antagonists in any secure location in such a
quantity to be used for multiple opioid overdose events; provided, however, that, if there
occurs a shortage of opioid antagonists, the institution shall make a reasonable effort to
maintain its supply of opioid antagonists. Any such supply shall be maintained in
accordance with the manufacturer's instructions.
(d) Subject to available funding from community funding sources, each institution
maintaining one or more automated external defibrillators shall maintain opioid antagonists
in an opioid antagonist storage compartment which shall be located within three feet of
such defibrillators or as close as space reasonably allows.
(e) Any university system personnel may administer an opioid antagonist to any person
who the university system personnel believes in good faith to be experiencing an opioid
overdose:
(1) While at an institution;
(2) While at a university system sponsored activity;
(3) While under the supervision of university system personnel; or
(4) Before or after normal institution activities.
(f) Any university system personnel who in good faith administers or chooses not to
administer an opioid antagonist shall be immune from civil liability or professional
discipline for any act or omission to act related to the administration of an opioid
antagonist, except that such immunity shall not apply to an act of willful or wanton
misconduct.
(g) Neither civil liability nor professional discipline shall accrue to university system
personnel and no civil liability shall accrue to the university system or to any institution of
H. B. 419 (SUB)
- 3 -

LC 61 0188S
such system due to the removal or misuse of an opioid antagonist or antagonists; provided,
however, that immunity shall not apply to an act of willful or wanton misconduct."
SECTION 1-2.
Said title is further amended in Article 2 of Chapter 4, relating to technical and adult
education, by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"20-4-39.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Automated external defibrillator' means a defibrillator which:
(A) Is capable of cardiac rhythm analysis;
(B) Will charge and be capable of being activated to deliver a countershock after
electrically detecting the presence of certain cardiac dysrhythmias; and
(C) Is capable of continuous recording of the cardiac dysrhythmia at the scene with a
mechanism for transfer and storage or for printing for review subsequent to use.
(2) 'Community funding source' means local sources of capital provided by local banking
institutions, including credit unions, community foundations, county or municipal
governments, businesses, or residents. Such funding sources may include grants, gifts,
contracts, monetary donations, or loans.
(3) 'Opioid antagonist' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section
26-4-116.2.
(4) 'Opioid antagonist storage compartment' means the structure in which opioid
antagonist may be stored.
(5) 'Technical college system' means the Technical College System of Georgia.
(6) 'Unit' means any institution, college, school, academy, or experiment station at any
particular location which forms a part of the technical college system.
H. B. 419 (SUB)
- 4 -

LC 61 0188S
(b) No student, visitor, or technical college system employee shall be prohibited from
possessing an opioid antagonist on technical college system property or at a technical
college system sponsored activity.
(c) Subject to available funding from community funding sources, each unit shall acquire
and maintain a supply of opioid antagonists in any secure location in such a quantity to be
used for multiple opioid overdose events; provided, however, that, if there occurs a
shortage of opioid antagonists, the unit shall make a reasonable effort to maintain its supply
of opioid antagonists. Any such supply shall be maintained in accordance with the
manufacturer's instructions.
(d) Subject to available funding from community funding sources, each unit maintaining
100 one or more automated external defibrillators shall maintain opioid antagonists in an opioid
101 antagonist storage compartment which shall be located within three feet of such
102 defibrillators or as close as space reasonably allows.
103 (e) Any technical college system personnel may administer an opioid antagonist to any
104 person who the technical college system personnel believes in good faith to be
105 experiencing an opioid overdose:
106 (1) While at a unit;
107 (2) While at a technical college system sponsored activity;
108 (3) While under the supervision of technical college system personnel; or
109 (4) Before or after normal unit activities.
110 (f) Any technical college system personnel who in good faith administers or chooses not
111 to administer an opioid antagonist pursuant to this Code section shall be immune from civil
112 liability or professional discipline for any act or omission to act related to the
113 administration of an opioid antagonist, except that such immunity shall not apply to an act
114 of willful or wanton misconduct.
115 (g) Neither civil liability nor professional discipline shall accrue to technical college
116 system personnel and no civil liability shall accrue to the technical college system or any
H. B. 419 (SUB)
- 5 -

LC 61 0188S
117 unit of such system due to the removal or misuse of an opioid antagonist or antagonists;
118 provided, however, that immunity shall not apply to an act of willful or wanton
119 misconduct."
120 PART II.
121 SECTION 2-1.
122 Code Section 31-2A-20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to accessibility
123 to opioid antagonists in government buildings and courthouses, guidelines and training, and
124 limitations on liability, is amended by revising subsection (a) as follows:
125 "(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
126 (1) 'Automated external defibrillator' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
127 Section 31-11-53.1.
128 (2) 'Courthouse' means a building occupied by judicial courts and containing rooms in
129 which judicial proceedings are held, provided that such building contains an automated
130 external defibrillator.
131 (3) 'Government entity' means any state board, commission, agency, or department, or
132 the governing authority of any county, municipality, or consolidated government, but
133 such term shall not include local school systems, public schools, charter schools, or
134 university buildings the University System of Georgia, or the Technical College System
135 of Georgia.
136 (4) 'Opioid antagonist' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section
137 26-4-116.2.
138 (5) 'Opioid related overdose' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section
139 26-4-116.2.
H. B. 419 (SUB)
- 6 -

LC 61 0188S
140 (6) 'Qualified government building' means a building in which a government entity is
141 housed or meets in its official capacity, including the portion occupied by a government
142 entity of any building that is not publicly owned, provided that such building contains an
143 automated external defibrillator, but such term shall not include a university building.
144 (7) 'University building' means any building which forms a part of the University System
145 of Georgia, including any college or university under the government, control, and
146 management of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, or any
147 building under the control of the State Board of the Technical College System of
148 Georgia."
149 PART III.
150 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 419 (SUB)
- 7 -